Tennessee statutes. Title 69 Waters, Waterways, Drains And Levees
Part 1

General Provisions

69-9-101. Accessory to violations punishable as principal.

Whoever aids, abets, counsels, commands, induces, or procures the commission of a violation of this chapter or title 70 and proclamations and rules and regulations promulgated by the fish and wildlife commission, is punishable as a principal.

Acts 1982, ch. 808, § 1; T.C.A., § 70-2247; T.C.A. §69-10-101; Acts 2012, ch. 993, § 8.

69-9-102. Sewage disposal.

Any person, firm, corporation or business entity operating a commercial boating facility, dock or marina that stores or houses vessels equipped with a toilet and sewage collection tank, or when such facilities are operating on waters in this state, shall provide facilities for the sanitary pumping and disposal of sewage from such collection tanks.

The sewage disposal facilities provided for in subsection (a) shall comply with the requirements of title 68 and this title, and are subject to any other regulation of the department of environment and conservation for the disposal of raw sewage.

For the purposes of § 69-9-219(a), each day on which a person, firm, corporation or entity operating such commercial boating facility, dock or marina does not comply with subsection (a) constitutes a separate offense.

A person, firm, corporation or business entity operating a commercial boating facility, dock or marina as provided in subsection (a) is exempt from the requirements of this section if such operator has entered into a valid agreement for the disposal of its raw sewage with another local boating facility, dock or marina. This exemption shall apply only where such other facility meets each of the requirements provided in this section for the sanitary pumping and disposal of raw sewage.

Acts 1991, ch. 218, § 1; 1992, ch. 693, § 1; T.C.A. §69-10-102.

Cross-References. Discharge violations by vessels, §69-9-216.